Washington statutes.
RCW 15.89.110

Annual assessment on beer production—Approval by referendum—Rules.

(1) Pursuant to referendum in accordance with RCW 15.89.040, there is levied, and the commission shall collect, upon beer produced by a producer, an annual assessment of ten cents per barrel of beer produced, up to ten thousand barrels per location.

(2) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing the time, place, and method for payment and collection of this assessment and provide for the collection of assessments from producers who ship directly out-of-state.

(3) The commission may reduce the assessment per producer based upon in-kind contributions to the commission.

[ 2011 c 54 s 5; 2006 c 330 s 14.]